Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,161
Public agency; powers.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating with local housing agencies in the planning, undertaking, construction, or operation of developments providing decent, safe, and sanitary housing that is affordable to persons of eligible income, and otherwise to assist local housing agencies in carrying out any other activities that are authorized under or in furtherance of the purposes of the Nebraska Housing Agency Act, any public agency may, with or without consideration:

(1) Dedicate, sell, convey, or lease any of its property to a local housing agency;

(2) Cause parks, playgrounds, recreational, community, educational, water, sewer, or drainage facilities, or any other works which it is otherwise empowered to undertake to be furnished adjacent to or in connection with housing developments;

(3) Furnish, dedicate, close, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan, or replan streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks, parking lots, or other places which it is otherwise empowered to undertake;

(4) Plan, replan, zone, or rezone any property over which it has such authority and make exemptions from building regulations, standards, resolutions, and ordinances;

(5) Enter into contracts, agreements, or arrangements which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary, with a local housing agency or the federal government respecting action to be taken by such public agency pursuant to any of the powers granted by the act;

(6) Do any and all things necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate in the planning, undertaking, construction, or operation of such housing developments;

(7) Purchase or legally invest in any of the bonds, notes, obligations, or other securities of a local housing agency and exercise all of the rights of any holder of such bonds or other instruments;

(8) In connection with any public improvements made by a public agency in exercising the powers granted in this section, incur the entire expense thereof. Any sale, conveyance, lease, agreement, or arrangement provided for in this section may be made by a public agency without appraisal, public notice, advertisement, or public bidding;

(9) Make donations, grants, or loans to such local housing agency as it shall deem necessary or desirable to promote decent, safe, and sanitary housing that is affordable to persons of eligible income in this state;

(10) Enter into agreements with a local housing agency for payments to it in lieu of taxes as authorized in subsection (2) of section 71-1590;

(11) Agree or arrange that a local housing agency shall manage, operate, administer, or assist in any of the activities authorized in subdivisions (1) through (10) of this section or any program of the public agency or for which the public agency receives funds, from either a federal or state governmental source, or from any other source, whether public or private, for the purpose of providing decent, safe, and sanitary housing affordable to persons of eligible income, to provide shelter, with or without other services, to homeless persons, to remove or rehabilitate unsafe or unsound dwelling structures, or for carrying out any other purpose of the act. Such agreements and arrangements may provide such compensation to a local housing agency for its services as the parties shall determine;

(12) Purchase or lease any goods, services, materials, equipment, or property from a local housing agency for any governmental or proprietary purpose for which the public agency is authorized by law to so acquire, on such terms and for such consideration as the parties shall determine, without advertisement, appraisal, or public bidding;

(13) Allow local housing agencies to purchase or acquire goods, services, materials, equipment, or property through its purchasing agency; and

(14) Upon its own initiative and without the approval of any other public agency or governing body, waive or reduce any charge or fee, including, but not limited to, any charge or fee relating to any permit, license, approval, or environmental or other impact fee, any contribution for capital improvements, and any charge or fee for any service or benefit provided by the public agency.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 90.